Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.100

Inappropriate use of chapter.

If a court determines, in any proceeding to enforce a civil right, that any interest, property, or contract has been transferred or acquired with the intent to delay the just enforcement of such right by taking advantage of this chapter, the court shall enter such judgment or make such order as might lawfully be entered or made concerning such transfer or acquisition.

[ 2005 c 254 s 10.]